Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska58-234
Authority; personnel.

The authority may employ legal counsel, technical experts, and such other officers, agents, and employees, permanent or temporary, as it deems necessary to carry out the efficient operation of the authority and shall determine qualifications, duties, compensation, and terms of office. The members may delegate to one or more agents or employees of the authority such administrative duties as they deem proper.

Laws 1983, LB 626, § 34;

Laws 1991, LB 253, § 35.